California statutes. Civil Code
Every person who, while lawfully in possession of an article of personal property, renders any service to the owner thereof, by labor or skill, employed for the protection, improvement, safekeeping, or carriage thereof, has a special lien thereon, dependent on possession, for the compensation, if any, which is due to him from the owner for such service; a person who makes, alters, or repairs any article of personal property, at the request of the owner, or legal possessor of the property, has a lien on the same for his reasonable charges for the balance due for such work done and materials furnished, and may retain possession of the same until the
charges are paid; and foundry proprietors and persons conducting a foundry business, have a lien, dependent on possession, upon all patterns in their hands belonging to a customer, for the balance due them from such customers for foundry work; and plastic fabricators and persons conducting a plastic fabricating business, have a lien, dependent on possession, upon all patterns and molds in their hands belonging to a customer, for the balance due them from such customer for plastic fabrication work; and laundry proprietors and persons conducting a laundry business, and drycleaning establishment proprietors and persons conducting a drycleaning establishment, have a general lien, dependent on possession, upon all personal property in their hands belonging to a customer, for the balance due them from such customer for laundry work, and for the balance due them from such customers for drycleaning work, but nothing in this section shall be construed to confer a lien in favor of a wholesale drycleaner on materials
received from a drycleaning establishment proprietor or a person conducting a drycleaning establishment; and veterinary proprietors and veterinary surgeons shall have a lien dependent on possession, for their compensation in caring for, boarding, feeding, and medical treatment of animals.

This section shall have no application to any vessel, as defined in Section 21 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, to any vehicle, as defined in Section 670 of the Vehicle Code, which is subject to registration pursuant to that code, to any manufactured home, as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, to any mobilehome, as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code, or to any commercial coach, as defined in Section 18001.8 of the Health and Safety Code, whether or not the manufactured home, mobilehome, or commercial coach is subject to registration under the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1124, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

3051a.

That portion of any lien, as provided for in the next preceding section, in excess of three hundred dollars ($300) for any work, services, or care, or in excess of two hundred dollars ($200) for any safekeeping, rendered or performed at the request of any person other than the holder of the legal title, shall be invalid, unless prior to commencing any such work, service, care, or safekeeping, the person claiming such lien shall give actual notice in writing either by personal service or by registered letter addressed to the holder of the legal title to such property, if known.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1005.)
-------------------------------------------

3051.5.

(a) A carrier has a lien on freight in its possession for the total amount owed the carrier by the shipper for freightage, charges for services and advances due on freight previously delivered upon the promise of the shipper to pay freightage, charges and advances, as provided in this section.

(b) The lien provided by this section shall not arise:

(1) Unless the carrier has notified the shipper, in writing, that failure to pay billed charges may result in a lien on future shipments, including the cost
of storage and appropriate security for the subsequent shipment held pursuant to this section.

(2) As to any freight which consists of perishable goods.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the notice and sale provisions of Section 3052 shall apply to the sale of property subject to a lien provided by this section.

(d) No sale of property subject to a lien provided by this section may take place for at least 35 days from the date that possession of the property is delivered to the carrier but the notice period set forth in Section 3052 may run concurrently with the 35-day period provided by this subdivision. In addition to the notices required by Section 3052, the lienholder, at least 10 days prior to any sale of the property, shall notify the shipper and the consignee of the property, and each secured
party having a perfected security interest in the property, of the date, time and place of the intended sale. This notice shall include the names of both the shipper and the consignee and shall describe the property to be sold.

(e) Any perfected security interest in the property is prior to the lien provided by this section. No sale of the property may be concluded if the amount bid at the sale is not at least equal to the total amount of all outstanding obligations secured by a perfected security interest in the property. If the minimum bid required for the sale of property pursuant to this subdivision is not received, the lienholder shall promptly release the property to the legal owner upon payment of the current amount for freightage, charges for services and advances due for shipment of that property, not including amounts due on freight previously delivered.

The proceeds of the sale shall be
applied as follows:

(1) First, to secured parties having a perfected security interest, in the amounts to which they are respectively entitled.

(2) Second, to the discharge of the lien provided by this section and the costs of storage, appropriate security, and of the sale.

(3) The remainder, if any, to the legal owner of the property.

In the event of any violation by the lienholder of any provision of this subdivision the lienholder shall be liable to any secured party for all damages sustained by the secured party as a result thereof plus all expenses reasonably and necessarily incurred in the enforcement of the secured party’s rights, including reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of suit.

(f) The shipper
shall be liable to the consignee for any damage which results from the failure of the property to reach the consignee as scheduled due to the carrier’s proper exercise of its lien rights pursuant to this section. The measure of damages shall be determined as set forth in Section 2713 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1375, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3051.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a carrier has a lien on freight in its possession for the total amount owed to the carrier by the owner or beneficial owner of the cargo being shipped for the aggregate amount of any fines, penalties, costs, expenses, or interest incurred by the carrier resulting from the inclusion of false or erroneous information as to gross cargo weight in a written or electronic certification provided by the owner, beneficial owner, or person responsible for making the certification pursuant to Section 508 of
Title 49 of the United States Code.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following freight:

(1) Perishable goods.

(2) Freight shipped by a means involving other than intermodal transportation, as that term is defined by Section 508 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(3) Freight shipped by loaded containers or trailers having a gross projected cargo weight, including packing material and pallets, of less than 10,000 pounds.

(c) Any sale to foreclose a lien specified in this section shall be conducted in accordance with Section 3052, except that (1) the lien sale shall not take place for at least 35 days from the date that possession of the property is delivered to the carrier,
but the notice period specified in Section 3052 may run concurrently with this 35-day period and (2), in addition to the notices required by Section 3052, at least 10 days prior to the sale of the property the lienholder shall notify the shipper and consignee of the property of the date, time, and place of the intended sale. This notice shall contain the names of the shipper and consignee and shall generally describe the property to be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 757, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3052.

If the person entitled to the lien provided in Section 3051 is not paid the amount due, and for which such lien is given, within 10 days after the same shall have become due, then such lienholder may proceed to sell such property, or so much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy such lien and costs of sale at public auction, and by giving at least 10 days’ but not more than 20 days’ previous notice of such sale by advertising in some newspaper published in the county in which such property is situated; or if there be no newspaper printed in such county, then by posting notice of sale in three of the most public places in the town and at the place where such property is
to be sold, for 10 days previous to the date of the sale; provided, however, that within 20 days after such sale, the legal owner may redeem any such property so sold to satisfy such lien upon the payment of the amount thereof, all costs and expenses of such sale, together with interest on such sum at the rate of 12 percent per annum from the due date thereof or the date when the same were advanced until the repayment. The proceeds of the sale must be applied to the discharge of the lien and the cost of keeping and selling the property; the remainder, if any, must be paid over to the legal owner thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1005.)
-------------------------------------------

3052a.

Every person, firm, or corporation, engaged in performing work upon any watch, clock or jewelry, for a price, shall have a lien upon the watch, clock, or jewelry for the amount of any account that may be due for the work done thereon. The lien shall also include the value or agreed price, if any, of all materials furnished by the lienholder in connection with the work. If any account for work done or materials furnished shall remain unpaid for one year after completing the work, the lienholder may, upon 30 days notice in writing to the owner, specifying the amount due, and informing him that the payment of the amount due within 30 days will entitle him to redeem the
property, sell any such article or articles at public or bona fide private sale to satisfy the account. The proceeds of the sale, after paying the expenses thereof, shall first be applied to liquidate the indebtedness secured by the lien and the balance, if any, shall be paid over to the owner.

The notice may be served by registered mail with return receipt demanded, directed to the owner’s last known address, or, if the owner or his address be unknown, it may be posted in two public places in the town or city where the property is located. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as preventing the lienholder from waiving the lien herein provided for suing upon the amount if he elects to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 279.)
-------------------------------------------

3052b.

(a) The procedure in this section shall be an alternative to the lien-sale procedure provided in Section 3052, but applies only to liens under Section 3051 for charges not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars ($150), exclusive of additional charges and interest authorized by this section. As a condition precedent to using the procedure specified in this section, the lienholder shall have done all of the following: 

(1) Provided the property owner with an accurate written summary of the lien provisions of this section. 

(2) Obtained the property owner’s address and telephone number, together with a written declaration signed by the property owner stating that the property owner has read and understands the summary provided pursuant to paragraph (1), at the time of entering into the transaction from which the lien arose. 

(3) Posted, at the time of the transaction from which the lien arose, a notice which fully and fairly informs the public of the substance of this section. The notice shall be posted in a location clearly visible to the public in the lienholder’s business premises.

(b) Any lienholder proceeding under this section shall notify the owner of the property subject to the lien upon completion of the work for which the lien is claimed. This notice shall be by first-class mail. 

(c) If a property owner who has actually received notice pursuant to subdivision (b) fails to pay the charges for which the lien is claimed for 30 days following receipt of the notice, the lienholder may thereafter charge two dollars ($2) per day for storing the property subject to the lien and these charges shall also be secured by the lien. 

(d) Not less than 30 days following the notice specified in subdivision (b), the lienholder shall notify the property owner by first-class mail that the property will be sold to satisfy the lien, unless the charges are paid within 30 days following the mailing of the notice. 

(e) If the lienholder has complied with the notice requirements of subdivisions (b) and (d), not less than 30 days have elapsed since the mailing of the notice required by subdivision (d), and the property owner has not fully paid the original charges for
which the lien is claimed plus any additional charges authorized by subdivision (c), the lienholder may sell the property subject to the lien at a public or bona fide private sale to satisfy the sum of those obligations, all costs and expenses of the sale, and interest at the rate of 12 percent per annum from 30 days following receipt of the notice specified in subdivision (b) or the date the same were advanced until repayment. 

(f) However, the owner of the property sold pursuant to subdivision (e) may redeem the property sold to satisfy the lien, within 20 days following the sale, upon payment of all charges, costs and expenses, and interest specified in subdivision (e). 

(g) The proceeds of the sale shall first be applied to the discharge of the lien, the costs of sale, and interest specified in subdivision (e). The remainder, if any, shall be paid to the former owner of the
property so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3052.5.

(a) Sections 3052 and 3052b shall not apply to any service dealer registered with the Bureau of Repair Services pursuant to Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 9800) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code if the dealer reasonably believes that the serviced product is of nominal value. For purposes of this section, nominal value shall be ascertained as follows: the product is not readily salable for more than the legitimate charges against it, and either the original retail value of the product was under two hundred dollars
($200) and the product is over three years old, or the original retail value is over two hundred dollars ($200) and the product is over six years old.

Service dealers may use any available materials or information, including, but not limited to, industry publications, code dates, sales records, or receipts to assist in determining value and age of the serviced product.

(b) A service dealer may select one of the following alternative methods for the disposal of unclaimed serviced products determined to have a value as specified in subdivision (a):

(1) The service dealer may provide the owner of the product with the following written notice to be mailed following completion of work on the serviced product:DATE BROUGHT IN DATE MAILED DATE PRODUCT TO BE SOLD IF NOT CLAIMED
NOTICE: YOUR PRODUCT HAS BEEN DETERMINED BY THIS SERVICE DEALER TO BE ONE WHICH WAS EITHER ORIGINALLY SOLD FOR LESS THAN $200 AND IS NOW OVER THREE YEARS OLD OR ONE WHICH WAS ORIGINALLY SOLD FOR MORE THAN $200 AND WHICH IS NOW OVER SIX YEARS OLD AND THE CHARGES FOR SERVICING YOUR PRODUCT WILL EXCEED ITS CURRENT VALUE. UNDER CALIFORNIA CIVIL CODE SECTION 3052.5(a) IF YOU OR YOUR AGENT FAIL TO CLAIM YOUR PRODUCT WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE DEALER MAILS A COPY OF THIS NOTICE TO YOU IT MAY BE SOLD OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF BY HIM OR
HER.

The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested. A serviced product may be disposed of 90 days after the date of deliverance evidenced by the signature in the returned receipt.

(2) The service dealer may publish public notice of the intended sale in a newspaper of general circulation. The notice shall contain a description of the serviced product, the name of the serviced product owner, and the time by which and place where the product may be redeemed. The notice shall be published for a minimum of five times. A serviced product may be disposed of 90 days after the last date of publication.

(3) A service dealer may, upon receipt of any product to be serviced by him or her, provide the owner of the product with the following notice, written in at least 10-point boldface type:DATE BROUGHT IN DATE MAILED DATE PRODUCT TO BE SOLD IF NOT CLAIMED
NOTICE: YOUR PRODUCT HAS BEEN DETERMINED BY THIS SERVICE DEALER TO BE ONE WHICH WAS EITHER ORIGINALLY SOLD FOR LESS THAN $200 AND IS NOW OVER THREE YEARS OLD OR ONE WHICH WAS ORIGINALLY SOLD FOR MORE THAN $200 AND WHICH IS NOW OVER SIX YEARS OLD AND THE CHARGES FOR SERVICING YOUR PRODUCT WILL EXCEED ITS CURRENT VALUE. UNDER CALIFORNIA CIVIL CODE SECTION 3052.5(a) IF YOU OR YOUR AGENT FAIL TO CLAIM YOUR PRODUCT WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE DEALER MAILS A COPY OF THIS NOTICE TO
YOU IT MAY BE SOLD OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF BY HIM OR HER.

PRINT YOUR NAME AND MAILING ADDRESS WHERE NOTICE MAY BE SENT TO YOU IN THE SPACE PROVIDED BELOW AND SIGN WHERE INDICATED TO SHOW THAT YOU HAVE READ THIS NOTICE.(Print Name)(Street Address)(City, State and ZIP Code)
IF YOU DO NOT AGREE WITH THE ABOVE DETERMINED VALUE OF YOUR ITEM, DO NOT SIGN THIS DOCUMENT.Signature:(Owner or Agent)
This notice shall be signed, addressed, and dated by the owner, with a copy to be retained by both the owner and the service dealer. At the completion of service, the service dealer shall by first-class mail, mail a completed copy of the notice to the owner of the serviced product at the address given on the notice form. A serviced product may be disposed of 90 days after the date of mailing.

(c) For purposes of this section, an owner is the person or agent who authorizes the original service or repair, or delivers the product to the service dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.

A factor has a general lien, dependent on possession, for all that is due to him as such, upon all articles of commercial value that are intrusted to him by the same principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3054.

(a) A banker, or a savings and loan association, has a general lien, dependent on possession, upon all property in their hands belonging to a customer, for the balance due to the banker or savings and loan association from the customer in the course of the business.

(b) The exercise of this lien with respect to deposit accounts shall be subject to the limitations and procedures set forth in Section 1411 or 6660 of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 30.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3059.

The liens of mechanics, for materials and services upon real property, are regulated by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 13.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

3060.

(a) As used in this section, “mine” means a mining claim or real property worked on as a mine including, but not limited to, any quarry or pit, from which rock, gravel, sand, or any other mineral-containing property is extracted by any mining, or surface mining, operation.

(b) Any person who performs labor in a mine, either in its
development or in working on it by the subtractive process, or furnishes materials to be used or consumed in it, has a lien upon the mine and the works owned and used by the owners for milling or reducing the ores from the mine, for the value of the work or labor done or materials furnished by each, whether done or furnished at the instance of the owner of the mine, or the owner’s agent, and every contractor, subcontractor, superintendent, or other person having charge of any mining or work or labor performed in and about the mine, either as lessee or under a working bond or contract thereon, shall be held to be the agent of the owner for the purposes of this section. The liens provided for by this section shall be enforced in the same manner as those provided for by Part 6 (commencing with Section 8000) of Division 4.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 263, Sec. 2.   (AB 2654)   Effective September 7, 2012.   Amended version operative July 1, 2012, pursuant to its own provisions.    Note: The earlier amendment by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, became operative on July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

3061.

Every person performing work or labor in, with, about, or upon any barley crusher, threshing machine or engine, horsepower, wagon, or other appliance thereof, while engaged in crushing or threshing, has a lien thereon to the extent of the value of his services. Such lien extends for ten days after any such person ceases such work or labor; provided, within that time, an action is brought to recover the amount of the claim. If judgment is given in favor of the plaintiff in any such action, and it is further found that he is entitled to a lien under the provisions of this section, property subject thereto, or so much thereof as may be necessary, may be sold to satisfy
such judgment; but if several judgment have been recovered against the same property for the enforcement of such liens, the proceeds of the sale must be divided pro rata among the judgment creditors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1905, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

3061.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), any person who as an employee shall, by their own labor, do or perform any work harvesting or transporting harvested crops or farm products as defined in Section 55403 of the Food and Agricultural Code have a lien upon any and all of the severed crops or severed farm products or proceeds from their sale for the value of the labor done up to a maximum of earnings for two weeks. The liens attach whether the work was done at the instance of the owner who is the grower or producer of severed crops or severed farm products or of any other person acting by or under the owner’s authority, directly or indirectly, as contractor or otherwise; and every contractor, subcontractor, or other person having charge of the harvesting or transporting of the severed crops or severed farm products shall be held to be the agent of the owner for the purposes of this section.

(b) The liens provided for in this section attach from the date of the commencement of the work or labor, and are preferred liens, prior in dignity to all other liens,
 claims, or encumbrances. Except as provided in subdivisions (a) and (c) they shall not be limited as to amount by any contract price agreed upon between the owner who is the grower or producer of the severed crops or severed farm products and any contractor, but the several liens shall not in any case exceed in amount the reasonable value of the labor done, nor the price agreed upon for the labor between the claimant and their employer. In no event, if the claimant was employed by a contractor, or subcontractor, shall the lien extend to any labor not contemplated by, covered by, or reasonably necessary to the execution of, the original contract between the contractor and the owner who is the grower or producer of severed crops or severed farm products and of which contract, or modification thereof, the claimant had actual notice before the performance of the labor.

(c) The maximum liability of severed crops, severed farm products or the proceeds from their sale subject to liens under this section is limited to the lesser of actual proved claims or 25 percent of the fair market value of the severed crops, severed farm products, or 25 percent of the proceeds after their sale.

(d) No person has a lien if the owner who is the grower or producer of the severed crops, severed farm products, or their proceeds, who otherwise would be subject to a lien pursuant to subdivision (a), either gives directly, or requires a person or entity hired or used to furnish labor in connection with harvesting or transporting the severed crops, to give to the Labor Commissioner before the harvest and for 45 days after its completion, a bond executed by an admitted surety insurer in an amount and form acceptable to the Labor Commissioner, that is conditioned upon the payment of all wages found to be due and unpaid in connection with the operations under any provision of this code.

(e) A buyer in the ordinary course of business, as defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 1201 of the Commercial Code, shall take free of any security interest created by this section, notwithstanding the fact that the lien is perfected and the buyer knows of its existence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   (SB 846)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3061.6.

(a) The lien created by Section 3061.5 shall continue in force for a period of 45 days from the time the person claiming such lien shall have ceased to do or perform the work for which such lien is claimed, and such lien shall cease at the expiration of the 45 days unless the claimant, his or her assignee or successor in interest, files a claim with the Labor Commissioner or brings suit to foreclose the lien in which case the lien continues in force until the claim filed with the Labor Commissioner or the lien foreclosure suit is finally determined and closed. If a claim is filed with the Labor Commissioner, the Labor Commissioner shall act upon and
finally determine such claim within 180 days after filing. In case such proceedings are not prosecuted to trial within two years after the commencement thereof, the court may in its discretion dismiss the same for want of prosecution.

(b) Upon filing a claim with the Labor Commissioner, the Labor Commissioner, if the owner who is the grower or producer has failed to satisfy the conditions of subdivision (d) of Section 3061.5, shall determine whether or not such owner of the severed crops, severed farm products, or their proceeds is capable financially of satisfying such claim. For purposes of this determination, it shall be proper for the Labor Commissioner after investigation to take into account the potential liability faced by such owner of such severed crops, severed farm products, or their proceeds. If the Labor Commissioner determines that a lien is necessary to protect the interest of claimants, the Labor Commissioner shall file such
lien on the crop, the severed farm product, or their proceeds and notify, in writing, the owner and notify, in writing, all persons who have filed financing statements on the crop, the farm product, or their proceeds pursuant to the provisions of the Commercial Code.

(c) The plaintiff in any such lien foreclosure suit, at the time of issuing the summons or at any time afterwards, may have the severed crops or severed farm products or proceeds from their sale upon which such lien subsists attached, as provided in this code and Title 6.5 (commencing with Section 488.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, upon delivering to the clerk an affidavit, by or on behalf of the plaintiff, showing that: (1) the plaintiff, or his assignor or predecessor in interest, performed labor in harvesting or transporting the severed crops or severed farm products or both; (2) that such labor has not been paid for;
(3) that the sum for which the attachment is asked does not exceed the lesser of the reasonable value of the services rendered or if earnings, does not exceed the lesser of two weeks unpaid earnings or reasonable value of actual services rendered, or 25 percent of the fair market value of the severed crop or severed farm product; and (4) that the attachment is not sought and the action is not brought to hinder, delay or defraud any creditor or creditors of any defendant.

(d) Any number of persons claiming liens under this section and Section 3061.5 may join in the same action and when separate actions are commenced, the court may consolidate them. If after sale of the property subject to the liens provided for in this section and Section 3061.5, under the judgment or decree of foreclosure of such lien or liens, there is a deficiency of proceeds, the proceeds shall be divided pro rata among the lien
claimants whose liens are established, regardless of the order in which the liens were created or the order in which the suits to foreclose same were commenced. Judgment for the deficiency may be docketed against the party personally liable therefor and his sureties.

(e) Nothing contained in this section or Section 3061.5 shall be construed to impair or affect the right of any person to whom any debt may be due for work done, to maintain a personal action to recover such debt against the person liable therefor, or his sureties, either in connection with the lien suit or in a separate action. The person bringing such personal action may take out a separate attachment therefor, notwithstanding his or her lien, and in his or her affidavit to procure an attachment need not state that his or her demand is not secured by a lien, and the judgment, if any, obtained by the plaintiff in such personal action shall not be construed to impair or merge any
lien held by the plaintiff under this section or Section 3061.5; provided that any money collected on the judgment shall be credited on the amount of such lien in any action brought to enforce the same, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(f) If the lien has attached to perishable goods, the lienholder may, during the period for which the lien is in effect and prior to the filing of a foreclosure suit, obtain a court order for the sale of such perishable goods pursuant to the provisions of Section 488.530 of the Code of Civil Procedure; provided, however, that in the event that such perishable crop is subject in whole or in part to a valid marketing agreement which is in force between the owner who is the grower or producer and an agricultural marketing cooperative organized under the Food and Agricultural Code or similar laws of other states, the agricultural marketing cooperative may purchase or otherwise take possession or
custody of such crop or portion thereof according to the terms of the marketing agreement. Any moneys due and payable to such owner who is the grower or producer in return for such crop shall be paid by the agricultural marketing cooperative to the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

3062.

Every owner or person having in charge any stallion, jack, or bull, used for propagating purposes, has a lien for the agreed price of its service upon any mare or cow and upon the offspring of such service, unless some willfully false representation concerning the breeding or pedigree of such stallion, jack, or bull has been made or published by the owner or person in charge thereof, or by some other person, at the request or instigation of such owner or person in charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1905, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

3063.

Every claimant of a lien provided for in the preceding section must, within 90 days after the service on account of which the lien is claimed, record in the office of the county recorder of the county where the mare or cow subject thereto is kept, a verified claim containing a particular description of the mare or cow, the date and place of service, the name of the owner or reputed owner of such mare or cow, a description by name, or otherwise, of the stallion, jack, or bull performing the service, the name of the owner or person in charge thereof, and the amount of the lien claimed. Such claim, so recorded, is notice to subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers of such
mare or cow and of the offspring of such service for one year after such recording.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

3064.

An action to enforce any lien created under Section 3062 may be brought in any county wherein any of the property subject thereto may be found, and the plaintiff is entitled to the remedies provided in Section 3065 upon complying with such section, which is hereby made applicable to the proceedings in such action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

3064.1.

Every person who wilfully advertises any cattle, horse, sheep, swine, or other domestic animal for purposes of copulation or profit as having a pedigree other than the true pedigree of such animal shall forfeit all right by law to collect pay for the services of such animal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

3065.

Any person who shall, by his own labor, or by using his livestock, machinery or appliances, or both, do or perform any work or render any service in connection with felling, preparing or transporting any logs, or in manufacturing lumber or other timber products from such logs, including the production of tanbark, shall have a lien upon any and all of such logs and upon any and all of the lumber and other timber products manufactured therefrom, whether said work was done or service was rendered on the logs themselves, or any of them, or in manufacturing the lumber or other timber products from them, for the value of such labor done and for the value of the use of such
livestock, machinery and appliances, or both, whether said work was done or service was rendered at the instance of the owner of such logs or timber products manufactured therefrom, or of any other person acting by his authority or under him, directly or indirectly, as contractor or otherwise; and every contractor, subcontractor or other person having charge of the felling, preparing or transporting of the said logs or of their manufacture into timber products shall be held to be the agent of the said owner for the purposes of this section.

The liens provided for in this section shall attach from the date of the commencement of such work or labor, or the date of the commencement of the use of such livestock, machinery or appliances, as the case may be, and shall be preferred liens, prior in dignity to all other liens, claims or encumbrances, except the landowner’s claim for a reasonable stumpage in cases where the landowner himself is not the direct employer or
contractor, as the case may be. They shall not be limited as to amount by any contract price agreed upon between the owner of said logs or timber products manufactured therefrom and any contractor, except as hereinafter provided, but said several liens shall not in any case exceed in amount the reasonable value of the labor done, or the reasonable value of the use of the livestock, machinery or appliances for which the lien is claimed, nor the price agreed upon for the same between the claimant and the person by whom he was employed or with whom the agreement to use livestock, machinery or appliances was made, nor in any case, where the claimant was employed by a contractor, or subcontractor, shall the lien extend to any labor or the use of any livestock, machinery or appliances not embraced within, contemplated by, covered by, or reasonably necessary to the execution of, the original contract between the contractor and the owner of such logs or timber products manufactured therefrom, or any modification
thereof made by or with the consent of such owner, and of which said contract, or modification thereof, the claimant shall have had actual notice before the performance of such labor or the use of such livestock, machinery or appliances.

The recording of such original contract, or modification thereof, in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the timberland on which the work is to be done is situated or in which the logs are to be manufactured into timber products, as the case may be, before the commencement of the work, shall be equivalent to the giving of such actual notice by the owner to all persons performing work or using livestock, machinery or appliances thereunder. In case said original contract shall, before the work is commenced, be so recorded, together with a bond of the contractor with good and sufficient sureties in an amount not less than fifty (50) percent of the contract price named in said contract, which bond shall in addition
to any conditions for the performance of the contract, be also conditioned for the payment in full of the claims of all persons performing labor, or using livestock, machinery or appliances, in the execution of such contract and shall also by its terms be made to inure to the benefit of any and all persons who perform labor or use livestock, machinery or appliances in the execution of the work to be done under the contract so as to give such persons, and their assigns or successors in interest, a right of action to recover upon said bond in any suit brought to enforce the liens provided for in this section, or in a separate suit brought on said bond, then the court must, where it would be equitable so to do, restrict the recovery under such liens to an aggregate amount equal to the amount found to be due from the owner of the said logs or timber products manufactured therefrom to the contractor, and render judgment against the contractor and his sureties on said bond for any deficiency or difference there
may remain between said amount so found to be due to the claimants for such labor and for the use of such livestock, machinery and appliances. It is the intent and purpose of this section to limit the owner’s liability, in all cases, to the measure of the contract price where he shall have filed or cause to be filed, in good faith, with his original contract a valid bond with good and sufficient sureties in the amount and upon the conditions herein provided. It shall be lawful for the owner of such logs and timber products to protect himself against any failure of the contractor to perform his contract and make full payment for all work done thereunder by exacting such bond or other security as he may deem satisfactory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

3065a.
